Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-616.04
Preservation of vital records; methods authorized.

To preserve vital records, the department may prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of certificates or reports of vital records. Such reproductions, when verified and approved by the department, shall be accepted as the original records, and the documents from which permanent reproductions have been made may be disposed of as provided by rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 529;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 142;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 418.